Arkansas, session 2025, HB1041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 6, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-6-106. Deceptive and fraudulent deepfakes — Definitions — Penalty —
Exceptions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Deceptive and fraudulent deepfake" means synthetic media
that:
(A) Inaccurately alters or artificially generates the
speech, conduct, image, or likeness of a candidate or political party with
the intent to injure the reputation of the candidate or political party or
otherwise deceive a voter; and
(B)(i) Appears to a reasonable person to depict an
individual saying or doing something that did not actually occur in reality;
or
(ii) Provides a reasonable person a fundamentally
different understanding or impression of the speech, conduct, image, or
*LJH017*
03-19-2025 15:05:33 LJH017

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H2/27/25 H3/19/25 HB1041
likeness of a candidate or a political party than a reasonable person would
have from an unaltered, original version of the image, audio recording, or
video recording;
(2) "Individual" means a natural person;
(3) "Person" means:
(A) An individual;
(B) A partnership, corporation, company, association, or
any other business entity;
(C) A not-for-profit corporation or association;
(D) An educational or religious institution;
(E) A political party; or
(F) A community, civic, or other organization;
(4) "Radio or television broadcasting station" includes without
limitation a cable or satellite radio or television operator, programmer, or
producer; and
(5) "Synthetic media" means an image, audio recording, or a
video recording of an individual's appearance, speech, or conduct that has
been created or intentionally manipulated with the use of generative
adversarial network techniques or other digital technology, including without
limitation artificial intelligence, in a manner to create a realistic but
false image, audio, or video.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a
person shall not, within ninety (90) days of an election in which a candidate
for an elected office will appear on the ballot, distribute synthetic media
that the person knows or should know is a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake
of a candidate or party on the state or local ballot.
(2)(A) A person may, within ninety (90) days of an election in
which a candidate for an elected office will appear on the ballot, distribute
synthetic media that the person knows or should know is a deceptive and
fraudulent deepfake of a candidate or party on the state or local ballot if
the synthetic media includes a disclosure, including without limitation the
following statement: "This content has been manipulated or artificially
generated."
(B)(i) If the synthetic media is visual, the text of the
disclosure in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall appear in a size
that is:
03-19-2025 15:05:33 LJH017

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H2/27/25 H3/19/25 HB1041
(a) Easily readable by the average viewer; and
(b) No smaller than the largest font size of
other text appearing in the visual media.
(ii) If the synthetic media is visual and in a video
or other format in which the synthetic media image changes, the disclosure
shall appear for the duration of the video or image clip.
(C) If the synthetic media consists of audio only, the
disclosure shall be:
(i) Read in a clearly spoken manner; and
(ii) In a pitch that can be easily heard by the
average listener at the:
(a) Beginning of the audio;
(b) End of the audio; and
(c) If the audio is more than two (2) minutes
in length, interspersed within the audio at intervals of no fewer than two
(2) minutes each.
(c)(1) A candidate or previous candidate whose appearance, action, or
speech is depicted through the use of a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake in
violation of subsection (b) of this section may seek injunctive or other
equitable relief prohibiting the publication of the deceptive and fraudulent
deepfake within two (2) years of the election date in the election in which
the deceptive and fraudulent deepfake was first used.
(2) The State Board of Election Commissioners may find an
individual liable for violating subsection (b) of this section and impose a
civil penalty of:
(A) The payment of a fine of not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000), if the person committed the offense within five (5) years
of one (1) or more previous convictions under this section;
(B) The payment of a fine of not more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000), if the person commits the violation with the intent to
cause violence or bodily harm to any person; or
(C) In any other case, to payment of a fine of not more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(d) This section does not apply to:
(1) An interactive computer service, internet service provider,
cloud provider, cybersecurity provider, communication service provider, or
03-19-2025 15:05:33 LJH017

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H2/27/25 H3/19/25 HB1041
telecommunications network when acting as a venue for the distribution by
another person of a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake;
(2) A radio or television broadcasting station, programmer,
producer or streaming service, mobile application, or online platform when
acting as a platform for the distribution by another person of a deceptive
and fraudulent deepfake as a paid advertisement;
(3) A person engaged in his or her ordinary course of business
as a contracted media buyer who contracts to facilitate the distribution by
another person of a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake as a paid
advertisement, including without limitation an advertising agency, media
placement company, or third-party marketing firm, when acting as a contracted
media buyer;
(4) A radio or television broadcasting station that broadcasts a
deceptive and fraudulent deepfake as part of a bona fide newscast, news
interview, news documentary, or on-the-spot coverage of bona fide news events
if:
(A) The broadcast clearly acknowledges in a manner that
can be easily heard or read by the average listener or viewer, through
content or disclosure, that the authenticity of the deceptive and fraudulent
deepfake cannot be confirmed; or
(B) Federal law requires a broadcaster to air an
advertisement from a legally qualified candidate that includes the deceptive
and fraudulent deepfake;
(5) A website or regularly published newspaper, magazine, or
other periodical of general circulation, including without limitation an
internet or electronic publication, that:
(A) Routinely carries news and commentary of general
interest; and
(B) Publishes a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake, if the
publication clearly states that the authenticity of the deceptive and
fraudulent deepfake cannot be confirmed; and
(6) Synthetic media that constitutes satire or parody.

/s/R. Scott Richardson


03-19-2025 15:05:33 LJH017